District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Fiscal Year 2025 Revised Local Budget Temporary Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Fiscal Year 2025 budget adjustments.
(a) Pursuant to the Full-Year Continuing Appropriations and Extensions Act, 2025,
approved March 15, 2025 (Pub. L. No. 119-4; 139 St at. 9), and D.C. Official Code § 47-369.02,
the appropriations set forth in the Fiscal Year 2025 Local Budget Act of 2024, effective
September 18, 2024 (D.C. Law 25-218; 71 DCR 8366), are decreased by ($236,858,618)
(including ($321,471,895) rescinded from local funds, $7,672,983 added to dedicated taxes,
($13,477,130) rescinded from Medicaid payments, $133,474,998 added to other funds,
($1,829,049) rescinded from enterprise and other funds, and ($41,228,524) rescinded from
enterprise and other funds – dedicated taxes).
(b) The adjustments made by subsection (a) of this section are allocated as follows:
Governmental Direction and Support
The appropriation for Governmental Direction and Support is decreased by ($9,440,941)
(including ($14,091,426) rescinded from local funds and $4,650,485 added to other funds), to be
allocated as follows:
(1) Board of Elections: ($351,606) is rescinded from local funds;
(2) Board of Ethics and Government Accountability: ($42,630) is rescinded from
local funds;
(3) Contract Appeals Board: ($29,340) is rescinded from local funds;
(4) Department of General Services: $6,064,619 is added (including $2,564,619
added to local funds and $3,500,000 added to other funds);
(5) Department of Human Resources: ($636,139) is rescinded (including
($371,772) rescinded from local funds and ($264,367) rescinded from other funds);
(6) Employees’ Compensation Fund: ($29,789) is rescinded from local funds;
(7) Executive Office of the Mayor: $590,000 is added to local funds;
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(8) Mayor’s Office of Legal Counsel: ($117,186) is rescinded from local funds;
(9) Office of Campaign Finance: ($1,556,796) is rescinded from local funds;
(10) Office of Contracting and Procurement: ($452,711) is rescinded (including
($2,465,286) rescinded from local funds and $2,012,575 added to other funds);
(11) Office for the Deaf, Deafblind, and Hard of Hearing: ($34,440) is rescinded
from local funds;
(12) Office of Disability Rights: ($107,297) is rescinded from local funds;
(13) Office of Employee Appeals: ($151,626) is rescinded from local funds;
(14) Office of Finance and Resource Management: ($150,000) is rescinded from
local funds;
(15) Office of Labor Relations and Collective Bargaining: ($582,594) is rescinded
from local funds;
(16) Office of Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Transgender, and Questioning Affairs:
($10,000) is rescinded from other funds;
(17) Office of Risk Management: ($93,545) is rescinded from local funds;
(18) Office of the Attorney General: ($1,988,327) is rescinded from local funds;
(19) Office of the Chief Financial Officer: ($2,000,000) is rescinded from local
funds;
(20) Office of the Chief Technology Officer: ($2,562,145) is rescinded from local
funds;
(21) Office of the City Administrator: ($2,057,551) is rescinded from local funds;
(22) Office of the Inspector General: ($2,445,992) is rescinded (including
($1,858,269) rescinded from local funds and ($587,723) rescinded from other funds);
(23) Office of the Secretary: ($118,100) is rescinded from local funds;
(24) Office on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs: ($192,965) is rescinded from
local funds;
(25) Office on Latino Affairs: ($258,976) is rescinded from local funds;
(26) Public Employee Relations Board: ($178,465) is rescinded from local funds;
and
(27) Tax Revision Commission: $52,660 is added to local funds.
Economic Development and Regulation
The appropriation for Economic Development and Regulation is decreased by
($34,728,240) (including ($32,804,447) rescinded from local funds, ($1,193,154) rescinded from
dedicated taxes, and ($730,639) rescinded from other funds), to be allocated as follows:
(1) Commission on the Arts and Humanities: ($881,154) is rescinded from
dedicated taxes;
(2) Department of Housing and Community Development: ($5,118,672) is
rescinded from local funds;
(3) Department of Small and Local Business Development: ($1,321,472) is
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
rescinded (including ($1,009,472) rescinded from local funds and ($312,000) rescinded from
dedicated taxes);
(4) Housing Production Trust Fund Subsidy: ($21,000,000) is rescinded from
local funds;
(5) Office of Cable Television, Film, Music, and Entertainment: ($1,359,081) is
rescinded (including ($922,875) rescinded from local funds and ($436,206) rescinded from other
funds);
(6) Office of Planning: ($168,114) is rescinded (including ($155,076) rescinded
from local funds and ($13,038) rescinded from other funds);
(7) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development:
($4,499,165) is rescinded (including ($4,276,564) rescinded from local funds and ($222,601)
rescinded from other funds);
(8) Office of the Tenant Advocate: ($163,247) is rescinded (including ($104,453)
rescinded from local funds and ($58,794) rescinded from other funds);
(9) Office of Zoning: ($181,837) is rescinded from local funds;
(10) Real Property Tax Appeals Commission: ($26,640) is rescinded from local
funds; and
(11) Rental Housing Commission: ($8,860) is rescinded from local funds.
Public Safety and Justice
The appropriation for Public Safety and Justice is increased by $30,171,940 (including
($129,579,471) rescinded from local funds and $159,751,411 added to other funds), to be
allocated as follows:
(1) Corrections Information Council: ($168,576) is rescinded from local funds;
(2) Criminal Code Reform Commission: ($151,942) is rescinded from local
funds;
(3) Criminal Justice Coordinating Council: ($240,483) is rescinded from local
funds;
(4) Department of Corrections: $12,227,432 is added to local funds;
(5) Department of Forensic Sciences: ($553,602) is rescinded from local funds;
(6) Department of Youth Rehabilitation Services: $11,780,952 is added to local
funds;
(7) District of Columbia National Guard: ($36,818) is rescinded from local funds;
(8) District of Columbia Sentencing Commission: ($187,609) is rescinded from
local funds;
(9) Fire and Emergency Medical Services: ($0) is rescinded (including
($152,300,000) rescinded from local funds and $152,300,000 added to other funds);
(10) Metropolitan Police Department: $19,486,493 is added to local funds;
(11) Office of Administrative Hearings: ($39,148) is rescinded from local funds;
(12) Office of Human Rights: ($1,206,623) is rescinded from local funds;
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(13) Office of Neighborhood Safety and Engagement: ($3,187,652) is rescinded
from local funds;
(14) Office of Police Complaints: ($236,953) is rescinded from local funds;
(15) Office on Returning Citizens Affairs: ($509,007) is rescinded from local
funds;
(16) Office of the Chief Medical Examiner: ($53,766) is rescinded from local
funds;
(17) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Public Safety and Justice: ($3,411,938) is
rescinded from local funds;
(18) Office of Unified Communications: ($897,339) is rescinded (including
($8,348,750) rescinded from local funds and $7,451,411 added to other funds);
and
(19) Office of Victim Services and Justice Grants: ($2,441,481) is rescinded from
local funds.
Public Education System
The appropriation for Public Education System is increased by $8,049,876 (including
$8,161,509 added to local funds and ($111,633) rescinded from other funds), to be allocated as
follows:
(1) Department of Employment Services: ($1,193,359) is rescinded from local
funds;
(2) Department of Parks and Recreation: ($5,308,220) is rescinded (including
($5,228,661) rescinded from local funds and ($19,559) rescinded from other funds);
(3) District of Columbia Public Library: ($308,598) is rescinded (including
($231,525) rescinded from local funds and ($77,073) rescinded from other funds);
(4) District of Columbia Public Schools: ($415,326) is rescinded from local funds;
(5) Non-Public Tuition: $8,000,000 is added to local funds;
(6) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Education: ($935,300) is rescinded from local
funds;
(7) Office of the State Superintendent of Education: ($6,769,009) is rescinded
(including ($6,754,009) rescinded from local funds and ($15,000) rescinded from other funds);
(8) Special Education Transportation: $17,070,000 is added to local funds;
(9) State Board of Education: ($47,273) is rescinded from local funds; and
(10) University of the District of Columbia Subsidy Account: ($2,043,049) is
rescinde d from local funds.
Human Support Services
The appropriation for Human Support Services is increased by $30,877,048 (including
$34,684,130 added to local funds, $8,917,082 added to dedicated taxes, ($13,477,130) rescinded
from Medicaid payments, and $752,966 added to other funds), to be allocated as follows:
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(1) Child and Family Services Agency: ($4,177,747) is rescinded from local
funds;
(2) Department of Aging and Community Living: ($508,935) is rescinded from
local funds;
(3) Department of Behavioral Health: $3,091,780 is added (including ($350,116)
rescinded from local funds and $3,441,896 added to other funds);
(4) Department of Health: $249,341 is added (including $1,296,409 added to local
funds and ($1,047,068) rescinded from other funds);
(5) Department of Health Care Finance: ($19,264,439) is rescinded (including
($13,062,528) rescinded from local funds, $8,917,082 added to dedicated taxes, ($13,477,130)
rescinded from Medicaid payments, and ($1,641,862) rescinded from other funds);
(6) Department of Human Services: $51,943,303 is added to local funds;
(7) Department on Disability Services: ($407,234) is rescinded from local funds;
and
(8) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Health and Human Services: ($49,022) is
rescinded from local funds.
Operations and Infrastructure
The appropriation for Operations and Infrastructure is decreased by ($41,733,899)
(including ($8,955,362) rescinded from local funds, ($1,940,945) rescinded from dedicated
taxes, and ($30,837,593) rescinded from other funds), to be allocated as follows:
(1) Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration: ($350,860) is rescinded
from other funds;
(2) Department of Buildings: ($4,902,828) is rescinded (including ($3,478,875)
rescinded from local funds and ($1,423,953) rescinded from other funds);
(3) Department of Energy and Environment: ($20,575,052) is rescinded
(including ($2,018,431) rescinded from local funds and ($18,556,621) rescinded from other
funds);
(4) Department of For-Hire Vehicles: ($4,866,997) is rescinded (including
($2,627,835) rescinded from local funds and ($2,239,162) rescinded from other funds);
(5) Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking: ($4,003,003) is rescinded
(including ($269,179) rescinded from local funds and ($3,706,824) rescinded from other funds);
(6) Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection: ($2,616,051) is rescinded
(including ($274,248) rescinded from local funds and ($2,341,803) rescinded from other funds);
(7) Department of Motor Vehicles: ($3,954,348) is rescinded (including
($2,532,119) rescinded from local funds and ($1,422,229) rescinded from other funds);
(8) Department of Public Works: $5,203,896 is added (including $5,226,425
added to local funds and ($22,529) rescinded from other funds);
(9) District Department of Transportation: ($6,123,793) is rescinded (including
($6,048,793) rescinded from local funds and ($75,000) rescinded from other funds); provided,
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
that all funds deposited, without regard to fiscal year, into the Tree Fund shall remain available
for expenditure until September 30, 2025;
(10) Office of the Deputy Mayor for Operations and Infrastructure: ($29,856) is
rescinded from local funds;
(11) Office of the People’s Counsel: ($815,300) is rescinded (including
($116,689) from local funds and ($698,611) from other funds); and
(12) Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority: $1,300,294 is added
(including $3,241,239 added to local funds and ($1,940, 945) rescinded from dedicated taxes).
Financing and Other
The appropriation for Financing and Other is decreased by ($176,996,828) (including
($178,886,828) rescinded from local funds and $1,890,000 added to dedicated taxes), to be
allocated as follows:
(1) Convention Center Transfer: $214,000 is added to dedicated taxes;
(2) District of Columbia Highway Transportation Fund: $1,676,000 is added to
dedicated taxes;
(3) Emergency Planning and Security Fund: $15,000,000 is added to local funds;
(4) Repayment of Contingency Reserve Fund: $62,193,935 is added to local
funds;
(5) Repayment of Loans and Interest: ($68,097,926) is rescinded from local
funds; and
(6) Settlements and Judgments: ($135,000) is rescinded from local funds; and
(7) Workforce Investments Account: ($187,847,837) is rescinded from local
funds.
Enterprise and Other Funds
The appropriation for Enterprise and Other Funds is decreased by ($43,057,573)
(including ($1,829,049) rescinded from enterprise and other funds and ($41,228,524) rescinded
from enterprise and other funds – dedicated taxes), to be allocated as follows:
(1) Housing Production Trust Fund: ($858,473) is rescinded from enterprise and
other funds – dedicated taxes;
(2) Repayment of PILOT Financing: ($38,502,226) is rescinded from enterprise
and other funds – dedicated taxes;
(3) Tax Increment Financing Program: ($1,867,825) is rescinded from enterprise
and other funds – dedicated taxes;
(4) University of the District of Columbia: ($2,043,049) is rescinded from
enterprise and other funds; and
(5) Washington Convention and Sports Authority: $214,000 is added to enterprise
and other funds.
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 3. Universal Paid Leave Implementation Fund transfer amendment.
Section 8002(b) of the Designated Fund Transfer Act of 2022, effective September 21,
2022 (D.C. Law 24-167; 69 DCR 9223), is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting the phrase “; and” in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the semicolon and inserting a period in its place.
(c) Paragraphs (3) and (4) are repealed.
Sec. 4. Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund transfer amendment.
(a) Section 15b(d) of the Hospital and Medical Services Corporation Regulatory Act of
1996, effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-192; D.C. Official Code § 31-3514.0 2(d)), is
amended by striking the phrase “fiscal years 2025, 2026,” and inserting the phrase “fiscal years
2026,” in its place.
(b) This section shall apply as of September 18, 2024.
Sec. 5. Sustainable Energy Trust Fund amendments.
Section 210(c) of the Clean and Affordable Energy Act of 2008, effective October 22,
2008 (D.C. Law 17-250; D.C. Official Code § 8-1774.10(c)) , is amended as follows:
(a) Paragraph (16)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “at least $7 million” and
inserting the phrase “at least $3.5 million” in its place.
(b) Paragraph (25)(B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B) For Fiscal Year 2025, $34,416,329;”.
Sec. 6. National, Lincoln, and Howard theaters grants.
Section 6d of the Commission on the Arts and Humanities Act, effective September 6,
2023 (D.C. Law 25-50; D.C. Official Code § 39-205.04), is am ended by adding a new subsection
(f) to read as follows:
“(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or the Grant Administration Act
of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.11 et seq.),
from the funds appropriated for the Large Capital Grants program, the Commission shall issue
the following grants in Fiscal Year 2025:
“(1) $4 million to the National Theatre, for the acquisition of and repairs to the
theater;
“(2) $500,000 to the Howard Theatre, for debt service payments related to
renovations and improvements to the theater and operational expenses of the theater; and
“(3) $285,000 to the Lincoln Theatre, for repairs to and renovation of the
theater.”.
Sec. 7. Non-lapsing account transfers.
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of law directing the deposit of revenue into, or
limiting the use of funds in, the accounts listed in the following chart, the Chief Financial Officer
shall transfer in Fiscal Year 2025 the following amounts from the certified fund balances and
other revenue in the identified accounts to the General Fund of the District of Columbia:
Agency Fund Fund Name Amount (in $)
Code Number
AD0 1060420 Inspector General Support Fund (587,722.82)
AG0 1060013 Accountability Fund (15,862.12)
AG0 1060029 Lobbyist Fund (38,516.13)
AM0 1060430 DCPS Rental Revenue (230,059.47)
AM0 1060206 Eastern Market Enterprise Fund (55,626.34)
AM0 1011014 West End Library/Firehouse Maintenance (314,735.33)
AT0 1060427 Child Wealth Investment Fund (8,620,876.82)
AT0 1060052 Recorder of Deeds Surcharge (863,854.43)
BD0 1060236 Historic Landmark and Historic District Filing (39,005.02)
Fees
BE0 1060399 Health Benefit Assessment (264,367.23)
BG0 1010094 Disability Compensation (169,066.85)
BV0 1060427 Child Wealth Investment Fund (9,416,933.55)
BX0 1060004 Arts and Humanities Enterprise Fund (2,499,999.74)
BX0 1011002 Dedicated Taxes (2,626,845.03)
CB0 1060035 Child Support – TANF/AFDC Collections (2,621,699.31)
CB0 1060094 Litigation Support Fund (15,957,248.61)
CB0 1060092 Nuisance Abatement (56,700.40)
CE0 1010109 Books From Birth (445,361.09)
CE0 1010105 Library Collections (2,139,562.10)
CE0 1060302 Revenue-Generating Activities (1,817,911.58)
CF0 1060416 Apprenticeship Fees (285,831.61)
CF0 1060104 DC Jobs Trust Fund (306,623.81)
CI0 1060009 Special Purpose Revenue Fund (913,053.51)
CJ0 1010015 Fair Elections Fund (10,087,655.84)
CQ0 1060261 Rental Unit Fee Fund (356,752.53)
CR0 1060272 Basic Business License Fund (3,946,070.47)
CR0 1060283 Corporate Recordation Fund (3,773,273.81)
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
CR0 1060277 DC Combat Sports Commission Fund (82,221.41)
CR0 1060267 OPLA - Special Account (3,189,507.89)
CR0 1060266 Real Estate Appraisal Fee (451,635.96)
CR0 1060265 Real Estate Guaranty and Education Fund (1,170,457.18)
CR0 1060284 Vending Regulation Fund (103,215.32)
CU0 1060279 Green Building Fund (630,409.52)
CU0 1060263 Nuisance Abatement (1,132,201.08)
DB0 1060069 DHCD Unified Fund (569,698.07)
DB0 1060027 HPAP - Repay (24.14)
EB0 1011013 Comprehensive Housing Task Force (0.90)
EB0 1060131 Economic Development Special Acct (4,973,910.90)
EB0 1060003 H St Retail Priority Area Grant Fund (0.12)
EB0 1060063 Industrial Revenue Bond Account (84,747.00)
EB0 1011016 St Elizabeths East Campus Redevelopment (445,000.00)
EB0 1011017 Walter Reed Redevelopment Fund (16,049.14)
EN0 1060134 Small Business Capital Access Fund (470,044.06)
EN0 1060303 Streetscape Loan Relief Fund (1,200.23)
FK0 1060208 Reimbursable From Other Governments (113,142.40)
FL0 1060014 Concession Income (73,352.44)
FL0 1060006 Corrections Trustee Reimbursement (2,550,543.80)
FL0 1060033 Welfare Account (473,736.09)
FO0 1010042 Community-Based Violence Reduction Fund (353,877.41)
FO0 1010043 Private Security Camera Incentive Fund (292,875.67)
FX0 1060419 Medical Examiner Pathology and Toxicology (64,039.92)
GA0 1060135 DHHS Afterschool Program-Copayment (154,087.13)
GB0 1060324 Administrative Fees (3,904,599.18)
GD0 1060107 Child Development Facilities Fund (0.18)
GD0 1011008 Healthy Schools Fund (1,258,792.60)
GD0 1060264 Site Evaluation (5,000.00)
GD0 1060041 State Superintendent of Education Fees (10,000.00)
GD0 1060102 Student Residency Verification Fund (0.23)
GL0 1060106 State Athletic Acts Program and Office Fund (147,695.56)
HA0 1060026 Enterprise Fund Account (371,032.39)
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
HA0 1060009 Special Purpose Revenue Fund (45,787.37)
HC0 1060429 Animal Education and Outreach Fund (3,776.00)
HC0 1060151 Board of Medicine (3,110,802.75)
HC0 1060188 Communicable and Chronic Disease (1,289,780.31)
HC0 1060186 DOH - Regulatory Enforcement Fund (8,784.00)
HC0 1060157 Health Facility Fee (54,790.00)
HC0 1060171 ICF/MR Fees and Fines (71,541.03)
HC0 1060133 Pharmacy Protection (427,758.78)
HC0 1060166 SHPDA Admission Fee (324,524.98)
HC0 1060050 SHPDA Fees (138,808.26)
HC0 1010214 Smoking Cessation Fund (200,072.75)
HC0 1060053 Vital Records Revenue (213,482.70)
HT0 1060138 Assessment Fund (37,028.71)
HT0 1060132 Bill of Rights (Grievance and Appeals) (1,720,097.43)
HT0 1011011 DC Provider Fee (1,807,317.40)
HT0 1011007 Healthy DC Fund (3,665,459.89)
HT0 1011010 Hospital Assessment Tax (261,700.72)
HT0 1060386 Individual Insurance Market Affordability and (11,793,836.71)
Stability
HT0 1060128 Medicaid Collections-3rd Party Liability (3,319,850.56)
HT0 1011003 Nursing Homes Quality of Care Fund (1,251,453.18)
HT0 1011009 Stevie Sellow’s (645,803.61)
HY0 1010001 General Purpose Local Fund (624,565.22)
JA0 1060039 SSI Payback (314,235.78)
JZ0 1060421 US Marshals Detention Services Agreement (120,400.00)
KA0 1060281 DC Circulator Fund - NPS Mall Route (743,221.94)
KA0 1060333 DDOT Enterprise Fund–Non-Tax Revenues (827,755.77)
KA0 1060260 General “O” Type Revenue Sources (895,342.45)
KA0 1060338 Parking Meter Pay-by-Phone Transaction Fee (176,588.95)
KA0 1060340 Vision Zero Pedestrian and Bicycle Safety (187,747.63)
KA0 1060280 WMATA Projects (214,870.17)
KE0 1011002 Dedicated Taxes (5,208,009.17)
KE0 1060019 Parking Meter WMATA (238,867.20)
10

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
KG0 1060363 Air Quality Construction Permits (715,988.78)
KG0 1060318 Benchmarking Enforcement Fund (55,717.11)
KG0 1060368 Economy II Fund (1,084.55)
KG0 1060330 Energy Assistance Trust Fund (779,128.84)
KG0 1060036 Fishing License (74,176.06)
KG0 1060187 Hazardous Generator Fees (296,824.96)
KG0 1060181 Lead Poisoning Prevention Fund (154,019.18)
KG0 1060155 Mold Assessment and Remediation Fund (63,072.98)
KG0 1060189 Payments From Independent Agencies (154,199.46)
KG0 1060366 Pesticide Product Registration (1,074,503.18)
KG0 1060159 Product Stewardship Fund (151,621.12)
KG0 1060174 Renewable Energy Development Fund (2,598,697.16)
KG0 1060365 Soil Erosion/Sediment Control (56,265.33)
KT0 1060286 Solid Waste Diversion Fund (288,602.81)
KG0 1060332 Special Energy Assessment Fund (93,589.20)
KG0 1060154 Storm Water Fees (481,244.34)
KG0 1060058 Underground Storage Tank Fines and Fees (8,810.05)
KT0 1060268 Super Can Program (100,499.13)
KV0 1060290 Fee – Out-Of-State Vehicle Registration (48,400.00)
KV0 1060310 Motor Vehicle Inspection Station (1,079,719.40)
LQ0 1060374 ABC–Import and Class License Fee (315,860.27)
LQ0 1011002 Dedicated Taxes (39,202.89)
LQ0 1060389 Medical Cannabis Administration Fund (13,167.28)
PA0 1060422 Gas Surcharge Revenue - Paygo (0.29)
RJ0 1060196 Captive Insurance Fund (113,365.14)
RJ0 1060146 Subrogation Fund (848,706.48)
RM0 1060123 Agreement with Independent Agencies (50,776.14)
SR0 1060252 Captive Insurance (751,893.94)
SR0 1060254 Foreclosure Mediation Fund (5,550.00)
SR0 1060240 HMO Assessment (329,372.48)
SR0 1060242 Insurance Assessment (3,345,087.29)
SR0 1060245 Securities and Banking Fund (1,092,333.69)
TC0 1060381 Public Vehicles-for-Hire Consumer Service (3,686,072.31)
11

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
VA0 1060007 Office of Veterans Affairs Fund (23,114.38)
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law directing the deposit of revenue, the Chief
Financial Officer shall transfer in Fiscal Year 2025 the following amounts of local revenue in the
General Fund of the District of Columbia to the accounts listed in the following chart:
Agency Fund Fund Name Amount (in $)
Code Number
FB0 1060016 FEMS Reform Fund 152,300,000.00
UC0 1060382 911 and 311 Assessments 7,700,000.00
(c)(1) The amounts identified in subsection (a) of this section shall be made available as
set forth in the approved Fiscal Year 2026 Budget and Financial Plan.
(2) The amounts identified in subsection (b) of this section shall be made
available as set forth in the approved Fiscal Year 2025 Budget and Financial Plan, as revised by
this act.
Sec. 8. Capital project funding rescissions and increases.
In Fiscal Year 2025, the capital project appropriations for Fiscal Year 2025 shall be
increased and decreased as set forth in the following chart:
Owner Budget
Fund Agency Adjustment
Project Detail Code (in $s)
100005-AM0.A0508C.WARD 8 SENIOR WELLNESS 3030300 BY0 (3,262,718)
CENTER
100006-AM0.AB102C.ARCHIVES 3030300 BA0 (56,383,497)
100009-AM0.ATCG1C.CTE ADVANCED TECHNICAL 3030343 GD0 (96,007)
CENTER 1
100014-AM0.BRM03C.DC GENERAL CAMPUS 3030300 AM0 (750,000)
RENOVATIONS
100018-AM0.BRM09C.EVIDENCE IMPOUND LOT 3030300 FA0 (70,000)
RENOVATION
100022-AM0.BRM16C.2215 5TH STREET NE BUILDING 3030300 GO0 (7,576,184)
RENOVATIONS
100039-AM0.COM37C.CONGRESS HEIGHTS 3030300 HA0 5,000,000
MODERNIZATION
100053-AM0.FTDAVC.FORT DAVIS RECREATION CENTER 3030300 HA0 2,600,000
12

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
100060-AM0.GI5JAC.BANCROFT ES ANNEX 3030300 GA0 (14,729,323)
100067-AM0.GM1SNC.DCPS SCHOOL NAME CHANGE 3030300 GA0 (1,425,000)
100084-AM0.HTSPKC.HEARST PARK 3030300 HA0 (27,488)
100084-AM0.HTSPKC.HEARST PARK 3030301 HA0 (38)
100086-AM0.JOH37C.JOHNSON MS 3030300 GA0 (1,079,957)
RENOVATION/MODERNIZATION
100087-AM0.KMS20C.ANACOSTIA RECREATION CENTER 3030300 HA0 (11,516,981)
@ KETCHAM ES
100094-AM0.LEDPKC.PARK AT LEDROIT 3030300 HA0 (3,660)
100117-AM0.NS021C.RENOVATION AND 3030300 NS0 (2,810,499)
MODERNIZATION OF ONSE BLD
100118-AM0.NWCRMC.NEW COMMUNITY CENTER @ 3030300 HA0 2,200,000
CRUMMELL SCHOOL
100125-AM0.OXR37C.OXON RUN PARK 3030300 HA0 (166,186)
100134-AM0.PL105C.ARCHIVES STABILIZATION (NAYLOR 3030300 AM0 2,000,000
COURT)
100139-AM0.PL337C.TRUESDELL ES 3030301 GA0 103,914
MODERNIZATION/RENOVATION
100152-AM0.Q11HRC.HILLCREST RECREATION CENTER 3030300 HA0 (196,500)
100153-AM0.QA201C.26TH & I STREETS PLAYGROUND 3030300 HA0 (1)
100159-AM0.QE238C.RIDGE ROAD RECREATION CENTER 3030300 HA0 (116,344)
100159-AM0.QE238C.RIDGE ROAD RECREATION CENTER 3030301 HA0 (38,775)
100163-AM0.QE8SWC.SOUTHWEST TOWN CENTER 3030300 HA0 4,500,000
PARKS
100164-AM0.QE8TPC.17TH & C SE TRIANGLE PARK 3030300 HA0 (83,350)
PLAYGROUND
100165-AM0.QE940C.RUMSEY AQUATIC CENTER 3030300 HA0 7,380,196
100165-AM0.QE940C.RUMSEY AQUATIC CENTER 3030343 HA0 119,804
100173-AM0.QL2ORC.OXON RUN REGIONAL DOG PARK 3030300 HA0 (750,000)
100177-AM0.QM8DCC.DOUGLASS COMMUNITY CENTER 3030300 HA0 (7,081)
100182-AM0.QN702C.ATHLETIC FIELD AND PARK 3030300 HA0 1,159,000
IMPROVEMENTS
100193-AM0.QP5ARC.ARBORETUM COMMUNITY CENTER 3030300 HA0 (4,149)
100205-AM0.RG0FWC.FITNESS AND WELLNESS HUBS 3030300 HA0 (1,750,000)
100209-AM0.RG0KRC.KENNEDY RECREATION 3030300 HA0 (61,670)
IMPROVEMENTS
13

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
100223-AM0.SGARBC.RITA BRIGHT COMMUNITY CENTER 3030300 HA0 (3,000,000)
100228-AM0.SH738C.DYRS YSC GYMNASIUM 3030300 JZ0 (0)
MODERNIZATION
100229-AM0.SH739C.DYRS YSC COURTYARD 3030300 JZ0 (157)
MODERNIZATION
100232-AM0.SH7HPC.YSC SMALL CAPITAL PROJECTS 3030300 JZ0 47,667
100236-AM0.SK120C.ATHLETIC FAC. IMPROVEMENT 3030300 GA0 3,648,928
100236-AM0.SK120C.ATHLETIC FAC. IMPROVEMENT 3030301 GA0 248,424
100237-AM0.SK1PBC.PEABODY PLAYGROUND 3030304 GA0 (373,281)
MODERNIZATION
100241-AM0.SP1EPC.EAST POTOMAC POOL 3030300 HA0 (9,000)
100249-AM0.THELCC.THEODORE HAGANS CULTURAL 3030300 HA0 (140,540)
CTR-THURGOOD MA
100255-AM0.THPRCC.THERAPEUTIC RECREATION 3030300 HA0 (14,001)
CENTER
100258-AM0.W4PLCC.WALTER REED POOL 3030300 HA0 (11,759,307)
100260-AM0.WD3PLC.HEARST PARK POOL 3030300 HA0 (15,022)
100263-AM0.YY101C.BANNEKER HS 3030300 GA0 (59,884)
MODERNIZATION/RENOVATION
100264-AM0.YY103C.FRANCIS/STEVENS ES 3030300 GA0 (1,700,000)
MODERNIZATION/RENOVAT
100267-AM0.YY108C.BROWNE EC MODERNIZATION 3030301 GA0 120,121
100270-AM0.YY142C.BRUCE MONROE ES @ PARKVIEW 3030300 GA0 (13,224)
ES MODERNIZATION
100276-AM0.YY151C.PEABODY ES 3030301 GA0 (30,040)
RENOVATION/MODERNIZATION
100282-AM0.YY160C.ADAMS ES 3030301 GA0 70,547
MODERNIZATION/RENOVATION
100297-AM0.YY182C.GARFIELD ES 3030300 GA0 (1,200,000)
RENOVATION/MODERNIZATION
100310-AM0.YY1DHC.DOROTHY HEIGHT ES 3030300 GA0 (1,000,000)
MODERNIZATION
100318-AM0.YY1SPC.CENTRALIZED SWING SPACE 3030301 GA0 3,909,670
100339-CB0.EN240C.INFORMATION SYSTEMS - CHILD 3030304 CB0 2,621,699
SUPPORT ENFO
14

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
100347-CE0.LB310C.GENERAL IMPROVEMENT- 3030300 CE0 1,673,000
LIBRARIES
100351-CE0.PTW37C.PETWORTH LIBRARY 3030300 CE0 1,334,681
100353-CE0.SEL37C.SOUTHEAST LIBRARY 3030300 CE0 (15,559,688)
100363-CI0.BP101C.HEADQUARTER PROJECTS FROM CT 3030314 CI0 (25,518)
100364-CI0.BP102C.SMALL CAPITAL PROJECTS 3030314 CI0 (574)
100371-CU0.ISM23C.IT SYSTEMS MODERNIZATION – DOB 3030304 CU0 3,330
100373-EB0.AMS11C.MCMILLAN SITE REDEVELOPMENT 3030300 EB0 (117,999)
100373-EB0.AMS11C.MCMILLAN SITE REDEVELOPMENT 3030301 EB0 (110,478)
100375-EB0.AWR01C.SAINT ELIZABETHS E CAMPUS 3030300 EB0 (393,901)
INFRASTRUCTURE
100378-EB0.EB001C.TEMPLE COURTS / NW1 3033425 EB0 (79,832)
REDEVELOPMENT
100379-EB0.EB007C.1234 MARION BARRY AVE SE 3030300 EB0 (500,000)
100379-EB0.EB007C.1234 MARION BARRY AVE SE 3030309 EB0 (1,500,000)
100384-EB0.EB409C.DC WATER NEW FACILITY 3030300 EB0 (7,515)
100384-EB0.EB409C.DC WATER NEW FACILITY 3030309 EB0 (6,216)
100389-EB0.EB450C.LEDROIT PARK 3030300 EB0 (5,564)
100391-EB0.FTJEBC.FLETCHER JOHNSON 3030300 EB0 (250,000)
100394-FA0.EPI20C.MPD--DISASTER RECOVERY 3030304 FA0 (3,003)
100404-FA0.PEQ22C.SPECIALIZED VEHICLES - MPD 3030304 FA0 (55,901)
100442-GF0.UG713C.BACKUS EXPANSION 3030300 GF0 (27,779,417)
100448-GO0.BU0B0C.BUS-VEHICLE REPLACEMENT 3030304 GO0 (3,188,497)
100450-GO0.BU501C.DOT GPS 3030304 GO0 1,287,014
100484-KA0.AD306C.PEDESTRIAN & BICYCLE SAFETY 3030301 KA0 (378)
ENHANCEMENTS
100496-KA0.BEE00C.BUS PRIORITY AND EFFICIENCY 3030301 KA0 (20,134)
INITIATIVE
100501-KA0.CA303C.STORMWATER MANAGEMENT 3030300 KA0 (4,000,000)
100501-KA0.CA303C.STORMWATER MANAGEMENT 3030301 KA0 (68,694)
100514-KA0.CE303C.STREET REPAIR MATERIALS 3030301 KA0 (7,568)
100519-KA0.CE310C.ALLEY MAINTENANCE 3030301 KA0 (27,436)
100527-KA0.CIR14C.CIRCULATOR BUSES 3030301 KA0 (2)
100529-KA0.CIRFLC.CIRCULATOR FLEET REHAB 3030304 KA0 (570,400)
100535-KA0.ED0D5C.11TH STREET BRIDGE PARK 3030301 KA0 (26,318)
15

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
100543-KA0.FLD01C.PREVENTION OF FLOODING IN 3030301 KA0 (20,951)
BLOOMINGDALE/L
100566-KA0.LMB38C.NORTH CAPITOL STREET SAFETY & 3030343 KA0 (119,804)
MOBILITY I
100571-KA0.LMBSSC.STREETSCAPES AND 3030301 KA0 (2,289)
BEAUTIFICATION
100573-KA0.LMC02C.K STREET TRANSITWAY 3030300 KA0 (121,757)
100574-KA0.LMC04C.5339A - BUS AND BUS FACILITY 3030300 KA0 (400,000)
FORMULA PRO
100575-KA0.LMC06C.CIRCULATOR BUS GARAGE / S. CAP 3030304 KA0 (48,066)
ST
100577-KA0.LMDB1C.TRANSIT HUBS 3030304 KA0 (350,000)
100581-KA0.LMEQ3C.ACTIVE TRANSPORTATION 3030343 KA0 (9,000)
EQUIPMENT
100626-KA0.LMS07C.CROSSTOWN BICYCLE LANES 3030300 KA0 (150,000)
100631-KA0.LMS12C.BUS PRIORITY PROGRAM 3030304 KA0 (33,934,568)
100642-KA0.LMT01C.STREETCAR VEHICLE 3030301 KA0 (1)
PROCUREMENT
100744-KA0.NPP01C.NEIGHBORHOOD PARKING PERF. 3030301 KA0 (1,304)
FUND
100790-KA0.PLU00C.POWER LINE UNDERGROUNDING 3030301 KA0 (24)
100870-KA0.SA306C.H ST/BENNING/K ST. LINE 3030300 KA0 (5,500,000)
100870-KA0.SA306C.H ST/BENNING/K ST. LINE 3030301 KA0 (24,862)
100879-KA0.SR301C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 1 3030301 KA0 (362,820)
100880-KA0.SR302C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 2 3030301 KA0 (314,211)
100881-KA0.SR303C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 3 3030301 KA0 (20,286)
100881-KA0.SR303C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 3 3030331 KA0 (13,536)
100881-KA0.SR303C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 3 3033534 KA0 (215,269)
100882-KA0.SR304C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 4 3030300 KA0 (0)
100882-KA0.SR304C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 4 3030301 KA0 (6,428)
100882-KA0.SR304C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 4 3030331 KA0 (38,445)
100882-KA0.SR304C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 4 3030332 KA0 (68)
100882-KA0.SR304C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 4 3033534 KA0 (7,883)
100883-KA0.SR305C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 5 3030301 KA0 (294,826)
100884-KA0.SR306C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 6 3030300 KA0 (0)
16

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
100884-KA0.SR306C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 6 3030301 KA0 (24,874)
100884-KA0.SR306C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 6 3030331 KA0 (1)
100884-KA0.SR306C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 6 3033534 KA0 (2,779)
100885-KA0.SR307C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 7 3030301 KA0 (5,169)
100885-KA0.SR307C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 7 3033534 KA0 (496,717)
100886-KA0.SR308C.LOCAL STREETS WARD 8 3033534 KA0 (204,887)
100887-KA0.SR310C.STORMWATER MANAGEMENT 3030300 KA0 (1,000,000)
100892-KA0.TRL01C.KLINGLE TRAIL COMPLETION 3030300 KA0 (213,540)
100895-KA0.TRL50C.TRAILS 3030301 KA0 (27,504)
100921-KE0.SA311C.WMATA FUND - PRIIA 3030300 KE0 49,500,000
100922-KE0.SA501C.WMATA CIP CONTRIBUTION 3030300 KE0 93,200,661
100938-KT0.BRTMOC.BENNING ROAD TRANSFER 3030301 KT0 (2,826,115)
STATION MODERNIZAT
100977-RM0.HX997C.FLOORING REPLACEMENT 3030300 RM0 (7,044)
101135-STREETCAR VEHICLE OVERHAUL 3030300 KA0 (3,929,000)
101185-KA0.PAVEDC.LOCAL STREET PAVING 3030300 KA0 (1,691,564)
101185-KA0.PAVEDC.LOCAL STREET PAVING 3030301 KA0 711,980
101185-KA0.PAVEDC.LOCAL STREET PAVING 3030331 KA0 51,982
101185-KA0.PAVEDC.LOCAL STREET PAVING 3030332 KA0 68
101185-KA0.PAVEDC.LOCAL STREET PAVING 3033534 KA0 927,534
101186-NS0.NS2FMC.ONSE FLEET 3030304 NS0 (125,286)
REPLACEMENT/UPGRADE
101215-GF0.UG720C.STUDENT HOUSING AT VAN NESS 3030300 GF0 (500,000)
CAMPUS
101218-GF0.UG723C.BUILDING 44 (DEMOLITION AND 3030300 GF0 (250,000)
RECONSTRUCTION)
101219-GF0.UG724C.PERFORMING ARTS CENTER/BLDG 3030300 GF0 (250,000)
46W (DEMOLITION AND RECONSTRUCTION)
101252-NATIONAL THEATRE 3030309 EB0 (7,300,000)
101257-CE0.BRIGHTWOOD PARK-MANOR PARK LIBRARY 3030301 CE0 (2,000,000)
101262-INTERIOR IMPROVEMENTS 3030301 JA0 1,000,000
101275-THE HENDERSON BUILDINGS 3030300 GA0 (9,000,000)
101321-MARION BARRY AVENUE CORRIDOR 3030301 KA0 (47,208)
300273-DC ARCHIVES BUILDING BUILDER’S RISK 3030300 AM0 (500)
INSURANCE - 100006
17

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
IBA_100084-FUEL SITE MAINTENANCE AND REPAIRS 3030300 KT0 2,565,029
IBA_100084-FUEL SITE MAINTENANCE AND REPAIRS 3030343 KT0 9,000
IBA_100110-RFK CAMPUS 3030300 EB0 52,177,159
IBA_100113-DC USA CONDO 3 CARPARK 3030300 EB0 171,602
IBA_100116-IT MODERNIZATION FOR STUDENT SUCCESS 3030304 GD0 799,021
IBA_100126-NEW BEGINNINGS-HOUSING BATHROOM 3030300 JZ0 476,672
RENOVATIONS
IBA_100128-NB-OASIS CAMPUS UPGRADES AND 3030300 JZ0 1,144,013
RENOVATION
IBA_100133-GALLERY SQUARE 3030300 EB0 2,092,590
IBA_100134-8th STREET WALK NORTH 3030300 EB0 3,182,173
IBA_100134-8th STREET WALK NORTH 3030343 EB0 96,007
NEW-FUTURE H ST/BENNING TRANSIT 3030301 KA0 250,000
Sec. 9. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 10. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Counc il to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
18

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
19